Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.430

Annuities and retirement income plans—Minimum monthly benefit—Computation.

(1) This section applies only to those persons who are first employed by an institution of higher education in a position eligible for participation in an old age annuities or retirement income plan under this chapter prior to July 1, 2011.

(2) For any person receiving a monthly benefit pursuant to a program established under RCW 28B.10.400, the pension portion of such benefit shall be the sum of the following amounts:

(a) One-half of the monthly benefit payable under such program by a life insurance company; and

(b) The monthly equivalent of the supplemental benefit described in RCW 28B.10.400(1)(c).

(3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, effective July 1, 1979, no person receiving a monthly benefit pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400 shall receive, as the pension portion of that benefit, less than ten dollars per month for each year of service creditable to the person whose service is the basis of the benefit. Portions of a year shall be treated as fractions of a year and the decimal equivalent shall be multiplied by ten dollars. Where the benefit was adjusted at the time benefit payments to the beneficiary commenced, the minimum pension provided in this section shall be adjusted in a manner consistent with that adjustment.

(4) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, effective July 1, 1979, the monthly benefit of each person who commenced receiving a monthly benefit under this chapter as of a date no later than July 1, 1974, shall be permanently increased by a post-retirement adjustment. Such adjustment shall be calculated as follows:

(a) Monthly benefits to which this subsection and subsection (3) of this section are both applicable shall be determined by first applying subsection (3) of this section and then applying this subsection. The institution shall determine the total years of creditable service and the total dollar benefit base accrued as of December 31, 1978, except that this determination shall take into account only those persons to whom this subsection applies;

(b) The institution shall multiply the total benefits determined in (a) of this subsection by six percent and divide the dollar value thus determined by the total service determined in (a) of this subsection. The resultant figure shall then be a post-retirement increase factor which shall be applied as specified in (c) of this subsection;

(c) Each person to whom this subsection applies shall receive an increase which is the product of the factor determined in (b) of this subsection multiplied by the years of creditable service.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 8; 1979 ex.s. c 96 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective dates—2011 1st sp.s. c 47: See notes following RCW 28B.10.400.